Hawaii statutes.
PART IV.
RELATING TO EXISTING HOMESTEAD RIGHTS;

CONTINUATION
THEREOF AND REMOVAL OF CERTAIN RESTRICTIONS

§171-97 Definition. As used in this
part:

"Cash freehold" means a right of
possession to land under an agreement called a freehold agreement under section
73 of the Hawaiian Organic Act.

"Certificate of occupation" means an
instrument preliminary to a homestead lease, giving the applicant possession of
land.

"Freeholder" means a person holding
land under a freehold agreement.

"Homestead lease" means a lease of
land made for a term of nine hundred and ninety-nine years, under provisions of
law which were repealed by section 3 of Joint Resolution 12, Session Laws of
1949, ratified by the Congress of the United States by the Act of September 1,
1950 (64 Stat. 572).

"Occupier" means a person entitled to
the possession of land under a certificate of occupation. [L 1962, c 32, pt of
§2; Supp, §103A-91; HRS §171-97]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next